Louisiana, session 2026, HB830.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 54 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3111 through 3113, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 54. PROXY ADVISOR TRANSPARENCY ACT
§3111. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Affiliate" means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with, another company.
(2) "Company" means a publicly traded, for-profit corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, or other business entity.
(3) "Company proposal" means a proposal made by a company to its
shareholders that is included in the company's proxy statement, including but not
limited to director nominations or elections, or a proposal relating to director
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-956 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 830
nominations or elections, executive compensation, corporate transactions, corporate
structure, auditor selection, or company policy on any subject.
(4) "Default recommendation or policy" means a system, set of rules,
principles, or guidelines designed to assist with voting decisions on any company
proposals or proxy proposals.
(5)(a) "Proxy advisor" means a person who, for compensation, provides a
proxy advisory service to shareholders of a company or to other persons with
authority to vote on behalf of shareholders of a company.
(b) "Proxy advisor" does not mean any of the following:
(i) An affiliate of the company.
(ii) A fiduciary or asset manager, or an affiliate of a fiduciary or asset
manager, where that fiduciary, asset manager, or affiliate acts pursuant to a
delegation of proxy voting authority from its client or beneficiary, and where that
delegation is made in connection with the management of client or beneficiary assets
and not as a commercial proxy advisory service offered to unaffiliated third parties.
(iii) A charitable organization exempt from federal income tax under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or its affiliated groups.
(6) "Proxy advisory service" means any of the following services that are
provided in connection with or in relation to a company headquartered or
incorporated in this state, or are provided to any person in this state:
(a) Advice or a recommendation on how to vote on a company proposal or
proxy proposal.
(b) Proxy statement research and analysis regarding a company proposal or
proxy proposal.
(c) Development of proxy voting recommendations or policies, including
establishing default recommendations or policies.
(7) "Proxy proposal" means a proposal made by a shareholder of a company
that is included in the company's proxy statement or has been submitted for inclusion
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-956 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 830
in the company's proxy statement, including but not limited to a proposal relating to
any subject that could be covered by a company proposal.
(8) "Shareholder" includes a shareholder, unitholder, limited partner, or other
equity owner of a company.
(9) "Written financial analysis" means a written document that does all of
the following:
(a) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and
costs to the company of implementing a company proposal or proxy proposal.
(b) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect
shareholder value.
(c) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the
recommendation.
§3112. Disclosure of lack of financial analysis to prevent fraud or deceit
A. If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against company
management on a company proposal or proxy proposal, or makes a default
recommendation or policy involving a vote against company management on a
company proposal or a proxy proposal, and the proxy advisor does not do so based
on a written financial analysis, the proxy advisor shall do all of the following:
(1) Include a clear and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, entity,
or other person acting on behalf of a shareholder receiving the proxy advisory
service, concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, that does all of the
following:
(a) Identifies the service being provided.
(b) Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.
(c) States that the proxy advisor has made the recommendation or policy
without doing so based on a written financial analysis regarding the impact of that
recommended action on company investors that does all of the following:
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-956 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 830
(i) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and
costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal.
(ii) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect
shareholder value.
(iii) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the
recommendation.
(2) For a proxy advisory service as defined in Subparagraph (a) or (b) of
Paragraph (5) of R.S. 51:3111, concurrently with providing the proxy advisory
service, provide the disclosure required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the
board of directors of each company that is the subject of the service.
(3) While any proxy advisory services described by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection are being provided, publicly and conspicuously disclose on the home or
front page of the proxy advisor's website a statement that the advisor's proxy
advisory services include one or more services that include a recommendation or
policy against company management on a company proposal or a proxy proposal that
are not made based on a written financial analysis regarding the impact of that
recommended action on company investors that does all of the following:
(a) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and
costs to the company of implementing a company proposal or proxy proposal.
(b) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect
shareholder value.
(c) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the
recommendation.
B. If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against company
management on a company proposal or proxy proposal, or makes a default
recommendation or policy involving a vote against company management on a
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-956 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 830
company proposal or proxy proposal, and the proxy advisor does so based on a
written financial analysis, the proxy advisor shall do all of the following:
(1) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include a clear
and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, or entity or other person acting on
behalf of a shareholder, receiving the proxy advisory service that meets all of the
following requirements:
(a) Identifies the service being provided.
(b) Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.
(c) States that the proxy advisor has made the recommendation or policy
based on a written financial analysis that does all of the following:
(i) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and
costs to the company of implementing that company proposal or proxy proposal.
(ii) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect
shareholder value.
(iii) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the
recommendation.
(d) The disclosure states that the written financial analysis is available upon
request.
(2) Make the written financial analysis available within a reasonable time to
any recipient of the proxy advisory service upon request.
(3) For a proxy advisory service defined in Subparagraph (a) or (b) of R.S.
51:3111(5), concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, provide a copy
of the written financial analysis to the board of directors of each company that is the
subject of the service.
§3113. Enforcement
A. A violation of this Chapter is an unfair and deceptive trade practice in
accordance with the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S.
51:1401 et seq., and is actionable in accordance with the enforcement provisions of
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-956 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 830
that law. The attorney general may exercise all investigative powers under the Unfair
Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law if the attorney general has reason to
believe a violation has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur.
B. In addition to enforcement pursuant to Subsection A of this Section, any
person aggrieved by a violation of this Chapter may bring an action seeking a
declaratory judgment or injunctive relief against a proxy advisor who violates this
Chapter. Within seven days of the date on which an action is brought in accordance
with this Subsection, the plaintiff shall provide written notice to the attorney general,
who may intervene in the action. For purposes of this Subsection, an aggrieved
person includes any of the following:
(1) A recipient of proxy advisory services provided by the proxy advisor.
(2) A company that is the subject of proxy advisory services as defined by
Subparagraph (a) or (b) of R.S. 51:3111(5) provided by the proxy advisor.
(3) Any shareholder, unitholder, limited partner, or other equity owner of a
company provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, and shall apply
prospectively.